Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,342
Snowmobiles; carrying firearms; hunting; unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any person to shoot, take, hunt, or kill or attempt to shoot, take, hunt, or kill any wild animal or bird from or with a snowmobile or for any person to carry or possess any shotgun or rimfire rifle while operating or riding on a snowmobile, or for any person to carry or possess any firearm, bow and arrow, or other projectile device on a snowmobile unless such bow and arrow or projectile device is enclosed in a car carrying case or such firearm is unloaded and enclosed in a carrying case.

Laws 1971, LB 330, § 20;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2020;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 439.